Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-128
Emergency assistance; families with children.

From such funds as may be appropriated for such purpose, the Department of Health and Human Services shall provide emergency assistance benefits on behalf of families who have children.

Laws 1973, LB 477, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 362, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 287.